District of Columbia statutes.
8-1318

Hazardous waste and toxic chemical source reduction plans.

(a)

Pursuant to rules issued by the Mayor in accordance with § 8-1322, beginning on January 1, 1992, and every 4 years thereafter, each business required to submit EPA Form R, and any additional data required, in accordance with § 8-1317, including any District or federal government operations where applicable, shall submit a source reduction plan to the Mayor.

(b)

Any source reduction plan submitted to the Mayor shall include the following:

(1)

A statement of facility-wide management policy regarding hazardous waste and toxic chemical reduction;

(2)

A statement of the scope and objectives of the plan, including the anticipated facility-wide reduction for each hazardous waste generated or toxic chemical used during the next 4 years;

(3)

An identification of the type and amount of any hazardous waste generated or toxic chemical released into the environment; and

(4)

A comprehensive economic and technical evaluation of appropriate technologies, procedures, and training programs to achieve hazardous waste and toxic chemical source reduction, including a schedule for and the estimated costs of implementation of the reduction.

History

Mar. 16, 1978, D.C. Law 2-64, § 20
as added Mar. 8, 1991, D.C. Law 8-229, title I, § 102(c), 38 DCR 246

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-734.